Ohio, session 136, SB427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4516.14 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4516.14. The regulation of peer-to-peer car sharing programs, shared vehicle owners, shared vehicle drivers, and peer-to-peer car sharing is a matter of general statewide interest that requires statewide regulation. Accordingly, except as authorized in section 4516.07 of the Revised Code, it is the intent of the general assembly to create uniform laws applicable throughout the state related to the licensing, registration, taxation, and general requirements and expectations for peer-to-peer car sharing programs, shared vehicle owners, shared vehicle drivers, and peer-to-peer car sharing through Chapter 4516. of the Revised Code.